Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.180

Crime or violation by license holder—Disciplinary authority may give notification.

If the disciplinary authority has reason to believe that a license holder has committed a crime, or violated the laws of another regulatory body, the disciplinary authority may notify the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney in the county in which the act took place, or other responsible official of the facts known to the disciplinary authority.

[ 2002 c 86 s 119.]